Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.650

Leave sharing program—Findings—Intent.

The legislature finds that: (1) State employees historically have joined together to help their fellow employees who suffer from, or have relatives or household members suffering from, an extraordinary or severe illness, injury, impairment, or physical or mental condition which prevents the individual from working and causes great economic and emotional distress to the employee and his or her family; (2) state employees have also joined together to help their fellow employees who are sick or temporarily disabled because of pregnancy disability or for the purpose of parental leave to bond with the employee's newborn, adoptive, or foster child; and (3) these circumstances may be exacerbated because the affected employees use all their accrued sick leave and annual leave and are forced to take leave without pay or terminate their employment. Therefore, the legislature intends to provide for the establishment of a leave sharing program.

[ 2018 c 39 s 1; 1989 c 93 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 39: "This act takes effect July 1, 2018." [ 2018 c 39 s 5.]

Severability—1989 c 93: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1989 c 93 s 8.]